Washington statutes.
RCW 4.64.120

Entry of abstract or transcript of judgment.

It shall be the duty of the county clerk to enter in the execution docket any duly certified transcript of a judgment of a district court of this state and any duly certified abstract of any judgment of any court mentioned in RCW 4.56.200, filed in the county clerk's office, and to index the same in the same manner as judgments originally rendered in the superior court for the county of which he or she is clerk. Jurisdiction over the judgment, including modification to or vacation of the original judgment, transfers to the superior court. The superior court may, in its discretion, remand the cause to district court for determination of any motion to vacate or modify the original judgment.

[ 1997 c 358 s 2. Prior: 1987 c 442 s 1111; 1987 c 202 s 119; 1929 c 60 s 4; RRS s 453; prior: 1893 c 42 s 5.]

NOTES:

Intent—1987 c 202: See note following RCW 2.04.190.